District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.53

Competitive appointments.

Appointments by the personnel authority shall be made on the basis of merit from among the highest qualified applicants, based on specific job requirements. Examining procedures shall be designed to achieve the maximum objectivity, reliability, and validity.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 953
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464

History

1981 Ed., § 1-610.53.

Prior Codifications

Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.

Editor's Notes